Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-717
Violation; penalty.

Any person who willfully fails to make any report of child abuse or neglect required by section 28-711 shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 156;

Laws 1994, LB 1035, § 6;

Laws 2005, LB 116, § 8.